Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-503
Charter amendments; petition; adoption.

Whenever any petition, as above provided, shall be filed with the city clerk and shall contain the required number of bona fide electoral signatures, asking for the submission of additional or alternative articles or sections in the complete form in which such articles or sections are to read as amended, they shall be deemed to be proposed for adoption by the qualified electors of said city with the same force and effect as if proposed by said convention, and the article or section which receives the majority of all the votes cast for and against said additional or alternative articles or sections shall be declared adopted, and certified to the Secretary of State, a copy deposited in the archives of the city, and shall become the charter or part thereof, of said city.

Laws 1913, c. 192, § 3, p. 570;

R.S.1913, § 5314;

C.S.1922, § 4537;

C.S.1929, § 19-503;

R.S.1943, § 19-503.